New York, session 2025-2026, S2716.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 563 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 563. Central state registry. 1. The justice center for the 4 protection of people with special needs shall create a central registry 5 which shall handle all criminal background checks for all current and 6 prospective agencies, sponsoring agencies or other providers of services 7 that are certified, authorized, approved or funded through contract by 8 the office for people with developmental disabilities. Such registry 9 shall contain a list of all employees who passed a criminal background 10 check. 11 2. The justice center shall establish rules and regulations for the 12 sharing of information via a consent form for employees in current and 13 prospective agencies, sponsoring agencies or other providers of services 14 that are certified, authorized, approved or funded through contract by 15 the office for people with developmental disabilities to allow for such 16 employees to work concurrently for or transfer between current or 17 prospective agencies, sponsoring agencies or other providers of services 18 without the need for duplicative criminal background checks. 19 3. The central state registry shall be accessible to current and 20 prospective agencies, sponsoring agencies or other providers of services 21 that are certified, authorized, approved or funded through contract by 22 the office for people with developmental disabilities upon receipt of 23 the consent form specified in subdivision two of this section by a 24 prospective employee who will work concurrently for or transfer between EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00961-01-5 S. 2716 2 1 a current or prospective agency, sponsoring agency or other providers of 2 services that are certified, authorized, approved or funded through 3 contract by the office for people with developmental disabilities. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 6 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 7 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 8 on or before such date.